Nevada, session 83, SB264.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 205.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.060 1. A person who, by day or night, unlawfully enters
or unlawfully remains in any:
(a) Dwelling with the intent to commit grand or petit larceny,
assault or battery on any person or any felony, or to obtain money or
property by false pretenses, is guilty of residential burglary.
(b) [Business structure with the intent to commit grand or petit
larceny, assault or battery on any person or any felony is guilty of
burglary of a business.
-
*SB264*

– 3 –
(c)] Motor vehicle, or any part thereof, with the intent to commit
grand or petit larceny, assault or battery on any person or any felony
is guilty of burglary of a motor vehicle.
[(d)] (c) Structure other than a dwelling [, business structure or]
or motor vehicle or a business structure pursuant to subsection 2
with the intent to commit grand or petit larceny, assault or battery on
any person or any felony is guilty of burglary of a structure.
2. A person who, by day or night, enters any business
structure with the intent to commit grand or petit larceny, assault
or battery on any person or any felony is guilty of burglary of a
business.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person
convicted of:
(a) Burglary of a motor vehicle:
(1) For the first offense, is guilty of a category E felony and
shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, is guilty of a
category D felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(b) Burglary of a structure is guilty of a category D felony and
shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(c) Burglary of a business is guilty of a category C felony and
shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(d) Residential burglary is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years.
[3.] 4. If mitigating circumstances exist, a person who is
convicted of residential burglary may be released on probation and
granted a suspension of sentence if the person has not previously
been convicted of residential burglary or another crime involving
the unlawful entry or invasion of a dwelling.
[4.] 5. Whenever any burglary pursuant to this section is
committed on a vessel, vehicle, vehicle trailer, semitrailer, house
trailer, airplane, glider, boat or railroad car, in motion or in rest, in
this State, and it cannot with reasonable certainty be ascertained in
what county the crime was committed, the offender may be arrested
and tried in any county through which the vessel, vehicle, vehicle
trailer, semitrailer, house trailer, airplane, glider, boat or railroad car
traveled during the time the burglary was committed.
[5.] 6. A person convicted of any burglary pursuant to this
section who has in his or her possession or gains possession of any
firearm or deadly weapon at any time during the commission of the
crime, at any time before leaving the dwelling, structure or motor
vehicle or upon leaving the dwelling, structure or motor vehicle, is
-
*SB264*

– 4 –
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 2 years and a
maximum term of not more than 15 years, and may be further
punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.
[6.] 7. As used in this section:
(a) “Business structure” means any structure or building, the
primary purpose of which is to carry on any lawful effort for a
business, including, without limitation, any business with an
educational, industrial, benevolent, social or political purpose,
regardless of whether the business is operated for profit.
(b) “Dwelling” means any structure, building, house, room,
apartment, tenement, tent, conveyance, vessel, boat, vehicle, house
trailer, travel trailer, motor home or railroad car, including, without
limitation, any part thereof that is divided into a separately occupied
unit:
(1) In which any person lives; or
(2) Which is customarily used by a person for overnight
accommodations,
 regardless of whether the person is inside at the time of the
offense.
(c) “Motor vehicle” means any motorized craft or device
designed for the transportation of a person or property across land or
water or through the air which does not qualify as a dwelling or
business structure pursuant to this section.
(d) “Unlawfully enters or unlawfully remains” means for a
person to enter or remain in a dwelling, structure or motor vehicle or
any part thereof, including, without limitation, under false pretenses,
when the person is not licensed or privileged to do so. For purposes
of this definition, a license or privilege to enter or remain in a part of
a dwelling, structure or motor vehicle that is open to the public is
not a license or privilege to enter or remain in a part of the dwelling,
structure or motor vehicle that is not open to the public.
Sec. 2. NRS 205.08345 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.08345 1. A person [who knowingly] commits an offense
involving organized retail theft if the person:
(a) Knowingly participates directly or indirectly in or engages in
conduct with the intent to further an organized retail theft ; or
(b) Buys, receives, possesses or withholds retail merchandise
knowing that it was obtained through an organized retail theft or
under such circumstances as should have caused a reasonable
person to know that it was obtained through an organized retail
theft, whether or not the person involved in the theft committed in
the organized retail theft is or has been prosecuted or convicted
for the offense.
-
*SB264*

– 5 –
2. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 is
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for:
(a) If the aggregated value of the property or services involved
in all thefts committed in the organized retail theft in this State
during a period of 120 days is at least $3,500 but less than $10,000,
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(b) If the aggregated value of the property or services involved
in all thefts committed in the organized retail theft in this State
during a period of 120 days is $10,000 or more, a minimum term of
not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15
years, and by a fine of not more than $20,000.
[2.] 3. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order a
person who violates this section to pay restitution.
[3.] 4. For the purposes of this section, in determining the
aggregated value of the property or services involved in all thefts
committed in the organized retail theft in this State during a period
of 120 days:
(a) The amount involved in a single theft shall be deemed to be
the highest value, by any reasonable standard, of the property or
services which are obtained; and
(b) The amounts involved in all thefts committed by all
participants in the organized retail theft must be aggregated.
[4.] 5. In any prosecution for a violation of this section, the
violation shall be deemed to have been committed and may be
prosecuted in any jurisdiction in this State in which any theft
committed by any participant in the organized retail theft was
committed, regardless of whether the defendant was ever physically
present in that jurisdiction.
[5.] 6. The Attorney General may investigate and prosecute a
violation of this section and any other statute violated in the course
of committing a violation of this section.
[6.] 7. As used in this section:
(a) “Internet or network site” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4744.
(b) “Merchant” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 597.850.
(c) “Organized retail theft” means committing, either alone or
with any other person or persons, a theft or series of thefts of retail
merchandise against one or more merchants, either on the premises
of a merchant or through the use of an Internet or network site, in
this State . [with the intent to:
(1) Return the merchandise to the merchant for value; or
-
*SB264*

– 6 –
(2) Resell, trade or barter the merchandise for value in any
manner, including, without limitation, through the use of an Internet
or network site.]
(d) “Retail merchandise” means any good, product, item,
property or anything of value that is typically displayed, held,
stored or offered for sale, trade or other transfer, at a store,
warehouse, building or other premises.
Sec. 3. NRS 205.0835 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.0835 1. Unless a greater penalty is imposed by a specific
statute and unless the provisions of NRS 205.08345 apply under the
circumstances, a person who commits theft in violation of any
provision of NRS 205.0821 to 205.0835, inclusive, shall be
punished pursuant to the provisions of this section.
2. If the value of the property or services involved in the theft:
(a) Is less than [$1,200,] $650, the person who committed the
theft is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(b) Is [$1,200] $650 or more but less than [$5,000,] $3,000, the
person who committed the theft is guilty of a category D felony and
shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(c) Is [$5,000] $3,000 or more but less than [$25,000,] $10,000,
the person who committed the theft is guilty of a category C felony
and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(d) Is [$25,000] $10,000 or more but less than $100,000, the
person who committed the theft is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(e) Is $100,000 or more, the person who committed the theft is
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than [1 year] 2
years and a maximum term of not more than 20 years, and by a fine
of not more than $15,000.
3. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order the
person who committed the theft to pay restitution.
Sec. 4. NRS 205.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.130 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection
and subsections 2 and 3, a person who willfully, with an intent to
defraud, draws or passes a check or draft to obtain:
(a) Money;
(b) Delivery of other valuable property;
(c) Services;
(d) The use of property; or
(e) Credit extended by any licensed gaming establishment,
 drawn upon any real or fictitious person, bank, firm, partnership,
corporation or depositary, when the person has insufficient money,
-
*SB264*

– 7 –
property or credit with the drawee of the instrument to pay it in full
upon its presentation, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If that instrument,
or a series of instruments passed in the State during a period of 90
days, is in the amount of [$1,200] $650 or more, the person is guilty
of a category D felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS
193.130. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order the
person to pay restitution.
2. A person who was previously convicted three times of a
misdemeanor under the provisions of this section, or of an offense
of a similar nature, in this State or any other state, or in a federal
jurisdiction, who violates this section is guilty of a category D
felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130. In
addition to any other penalty, the court shall order the person to pay
restitution.
3. A person who willfully issues any check or draft for the
payment of wages in excess of [$1,200,] $650, when the person
knows he or she has insufficient money or credit with the drawee of
the instrument to pay the instrument in full upon presentation is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
4. For the purposes of this section, “credit” means an
arrangement or understanding with a person, firm, corporation, bank
or depositary for the payment of a check or other instrument.
Sec. 5. NRS 205.134 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.134 1. A notice in boldface type which is clearly legible
and is in substantially the following form must be posted in a
conspicuous place in every principal and branch office of every
bank and in every place of business in which retail selling is
conducted:

The issuance of a check or draft without sufficient money
or with intent to defraud is punishable by imprisonment in the
county jail for not more than 6 months, or by a fine of not
more than $1,000, or by both fine and imprisonment, and the
issuance of such a check or draft in an amount of [$1,200]
$650 or more or by a person who previously has been
convicted three times of this or a similar offense is punishable
as a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130.

2. Failure of the owner, operator or manager of a bank or other
place of business to post the sign required by this section is not a
defense to charge of a violation of NRS 205.130.
Sec. 6. NRS 205.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.220 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 205.226 and
205.228, a person commits grand larceny if the person:
-
*SB264*

– 8 –
1. Intentionally steals, takes and carries away, leads away or
drives away:
(a) Personal goods or property, with a value of [$1,200] $650 or
more, owned by another person;
(b) Bedding, furniture or other property, with a value of
[$1,200] $650 or more, which the person, as a lodger, is to use in or
with his or her lodging and which is owned by another person; or
(c) Real property, with a value of [$1,200] $650 or more, that
the person has converted into personal property by severing it from
real property owned by another person.
2. Uses a card or other device for automatically withdrawing or
transferring money in a financial institution to obtain intentionally
money to which the person knows he or she is not entitled.
3. Intentionally steals, takes and carries away, leads away,
drives away or entices away:
(a) One or more head of livestock owned by another person; or
(b) One or more domesticated animals or domesticated birds,
with an aggregate value of [$1,200] $650 or more, owned by
another person.
4. With the intent to defraud, steal, appropriate or prevent
identification:
(a) Marks or brands, causes to be marked or branded, alters or
defaces a mark or brand, or causes to be altered or defaced a mark or
brand upon one or more head of livestock owned by another person;
(b) Sells or purchases the hide or carcass of one or more head of
livestock owned by another person that has had a mark or brand cut
out or obliterated;
(c) Kills one or more head of livestock owned by another person
but running at large, whether or not the livestock is marked or
branded; or
(d) Kills one or more domesticated animals or domesticated
birds, with an aggregate value of [$1,200] $650 or more, owned by
another person but running at large, whether or not the animals or
birds are marked or branded.
Sec. 7. NRS 205.222 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.222 1. Unless a greater penalty is imposed by a specific
statute, a person who commits grand larceny in violation of NRS
205.220 shall be punished pursuant to the provisions of this section.
2. If the value of the property involved in the grand larceny:
(a) Is less than [$5,000,] $3,000, the person who committed the
grand larceny is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished
as provided in NRS 193.130.
(b) Is [$5,000] $3,000 or more but less than [$25,000,] $10,000,
the person who committed the grand larceny is guilty of a category
C felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
-
*SB264*

– 9 –
(c) Is [$25,000] $10,000 or more but less than $100,000, the
person who committed the grand larceny is guilty of a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(d) Is $100,000 or more, the person who committed the grand
larceny is guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than [1 year] 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 20
years, and by a fine of not more than $15,000.
3. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order the
person who committed the grand larceny to pay restitution.
4. If the grand larceny involved a sale in violation of
subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 205.220, all proceeds from the sale are
subject to forfeiture.
Sec. 8. NRS 205.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.240 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 205.220,
205.226, 205.228, 475.105 and 501.3765, a person commits petit
larceny if the person:
(a) Intentionally steals, takes and carries away, leads away or
drives away:
(1) Personal goods or property, with a value of less than
[$1,200,] $650, owned by another person;
(2) Bedding, furniture or other property, with a value of less
than [$1,200,] $650, which the person, as a lodger, is to use in or
with his or her lodging and which is owned by another person; or
(3) Real property, with a value of less than [$1,200,] $650,
that the person has converted into personal property by severing it
from real property owned by another person.
(b) Intentionally steals, takes and carries away, leads away,
drives away or entices away one or more domesticated animals or
domesticated birds, with an aggregate value of less than [$1,200,]
$650, owned by another person.
2. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to NRS
205.267, a person who commits petit larceny is guilty of a
misdemeanor. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order
the person to pay restitution.
Sec. 9. NRS 205.267 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.267 1. A person who intentionally steals, takes and
carries away scrap metal or utility property with a value of less than
[$1,200] $650 within a period of 90 days is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
2. A person who intentionally steals, takes and carries away
scrap metal or utility property with a value of [$1,200] $650 or more
within a period of 90 days is guilty of:
-
*SB264*

– 10 –
(a) If the value of the scrap metal or utility property taken is
[$1,200] $650 or more but less than [$5,000,] $3,000, a category D
felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
(b) If the value of the scrap metal or utility property taken is
[$5,000] $3,000 or more but less than [$25,000,] $10,000, a
category C felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) If the value of the scrap metal or utility property taken is
[$25,000] $10,000 or more but less than $100,000, a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(d) If the value of the scrap metal or utility property taken is
$100,000 or more, a category B felony and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than [1 year] 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 20
years, and by a fine of not more than $15,000.
3. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order a
person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 or 2 to pay
restitution and:
(a) For a first offense, to perform 100 hours of community
service.
(b) For a second offense, to perform 200 hours of community
service.
(c) For a third or subsequent offense, to perform up to 300 hours
of community service for up to 1 year, as determined by the court.
4. In determining the value of the scrap metal or utility
property taken, the cost of repairing and, if necessary, replacing any
property damaged by the theft of the scrap metal or utility property
must be added to the value of the property.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Scrap metal” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 647.017.
(b) “Utility property” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.582.
Sec. 10. NRS 205.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.275 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 205.08345
and 501.3765, a person commits an offense involving stolen
property if the person, for his or her own gain or to prevent the
owner from again possessing the owner’s property, buys, receives,
possesses or withholds property:
(a) Knowing that it is stolen property; or
(b) Under such circumstances as should have caused a
reasonable person to know that it is stolen property.
-
*SB264*

– 11 –
2. A person who commits an offense involving stolen property
in violation of subsection 1:
(a) If the value of the property is less than [$1,200,] $650, is
guilty of a misdemeanor;
(b) If the value of the property is [$1,200] $650 or more but less
than [$5,000,] $3,000, is guilty of a category D felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130;
(c) If the value of the property is [$5,000] $3,000 or more but
less than [$25,000,] $10,000, is guilty of a category C felony and
shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130;
(d) If the value of the property is [$25,000] $10,000 or more but
less than $100,000 or if the property is a firearm, is guilty of a
category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more
than $10,000; or
(e) If the value of the property is $100,000 or more, is guilty of a
category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than [1 year] 2 years and
a maximum term of not more than 20 years, and by a fine of not
more than $15,000.
3. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order the
person to pay restitution.
4. A person may be prosecuted and convicted pursuant to this
section whether or not the principal is or has been prosecuted or
convicted.
5. Possession by any person of three or more items of the same
or a similar class or type of personal property on which a
permanently affixed manufacturer’s serial number or manufacturer’s
identification number has been removed, altered or defaced, is prima
facie evidence that the person has violated this section.
6. For the purposes of this section, the value of the property
involved shall be deemed to be the highest value attributable to the
property by any reasonable standard.
7. As used in this section, “stolen property” means property
that has been taken from its owner by larceny, robbery, burglary,
embezzlement, theft or any other offense that is a crime against
property, whether or not the person who committed the taking is or
has been prosecuted or convicted for the offense.
Sec. 11. NRS 205.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.365 A person, after once selling, bartering or disposing of
any tract of land, town lot, or executing any bond or agreement for
the sale of any land or town lot, who again, knowingly and
fraudulently, sells, barters or disposes of the same tract of land or
lot, or any part thereof, or knowingly and fraudulently executes any
-
*SB264*

– 12 –
bond or agreement to sell, barter or dispose of the same land or lot,
or any part thereof, to any other person, for a valuable consideration,
shall be punished:
1. Where the value of the property involved is [$1,200] $650 or
more, for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130. In
addition to any other penalty, the court shall order the person to pay
restitution.
2. Where the value of the property is less than [$1,200,] $650,
for a misdemeanor.
Sec. 12. NRS 205.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.370 1. A person who, by false representations of his or
her own wealth, or mercantile correspondence and connections,
obtains a credit thereby and defrauds any person of money, goods,
chattels or any valuable thing, or if a person causes or procures
another to report falsely of his or her wealth or mercantile character,
and by thus imposing upon any person obtains credit and thereby
fraudulently gets into the possession of goods, wares or
merchandise, or other valuable thing, is a swindler, and must be
sentenced to return the property fraudulently obtained, if it can be
done, or to pay restitution and shall be punished:
(a) Where the amount of money or the value of the chattels,
goods, wares or merchandise, or other valuable thing so obtained is
[$1,200] $650 or more, for a category D felony as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(b) Otherwise, for a misdemeanor.
2. In any prosecution for a violation of this section, the State is
not required to establish that all of the acts constituting the crime
occurred in this State or within a single city, county or local
jurisdiction of this State, and it is no defense that not all of the acts
constituting the crime occurred in this State or within a single city,
county or local jurisdiction of this State.
Sec. 13. NRS 205.377 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.377 1. A person shall not, in the course of an enterprise
or occupation, knowingly and with the intent to defraud, engage in
an act, practice or course of business or employ a device, scheme or
artifice which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon a
person by means of a false representation or omission of a material
fact that:
(a) The person knows to be false or omitted;
(b) The person intends another to rely on; and
(c) Results in a loss to any person who relied on the false
representation or omission,
 in at least two transactions that have the same or similar pattern,
intents, results, accomplices, victims or methods of commission, or
are otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics and are
-
*SB264*

– 13 –
not isolated incidents within 4 years and in which the aggregate loss
or intended loss is more than [$1,200.] $650.
2. Each act which violates subsection 1 constitutes a separate
offense.
3. A person who violates subsection 1 is guilty of a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 20 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $10,000.
4. In addition to any other penalty, the court shall order a
person who violates subsection 1 to pay restitution.
5. A violation of this section constitutes a deceptive trade
practice for the purposes of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
6. The Attorney General may investigate and prosecute a
violation of this section and any other statute violated in the course
of committing a violation of this section.
7. As used in this section, “enterprise” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 207.380.
Sec. 14. NRS 205.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.380 1. A person who knowingly and designedly by any
false pretense obtains from any other person any chose in action,
money, goods, wares, chattels, effects or other valuable thing,
including rent or the labor of another person not his or her
employee, with the intent to cheat or defraud the other person, is a
cheat, and, unless otherwise prescribed by law, shall be punished:
(a) If the value of the thing or labor fraudulently obtained was
less than [$1,200,] $650, for a misdemeanor, and must be sentenced
to restore the property fraudulently obtained if it can be done, or
tender payment for rent or labor.
(b) If the value of the thing or labor fraudulently obtained was
[$1,200] $650 or more but less than [$5,000,] $3,000, for a category
D felony as provided in NRS 193.130.
(c) If the value of the thing or labor fraudulently obtained was
[$5,000] $3,000 or more but less than [$25,000,] $10,000, for a
category C felony as provided in NRS 193.130.
(d) If the value of the thing or labor fraudulently obtained was
[$25,000] $10,000 or more but less than $100,000, for a category B
felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of
not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 10 years,
and by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(e) If the value of the thing or labor fraudulently obtained was
$100,000 or more, for a category B felony by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than [1 year] 2 years and
a maximum term of not more than 20 years, and by a fine of not
more than $15,000.
-
*SB264*

– 14 –
2. In addition to any other penalty set forth in paragraph (b),
(c), (d) or (e) of subsection 1, the court shall order the person to pay
restitution.
3. For the purposes of this section, it is prima facie evidence of
an intent to defraud if the drawer of a check or other instrument
given in payment for:
(a) Property which can be returned in the same condition in
which it was originally received;
(b) Rent; or
(c) Labor performed in a workmanlike manner whenever a
written estimate was furnished before the labor was performed and
the actual cost of the labor does not exceed the estimate,
 stops payment on that instrument and fails to return or offer to
return the property in that condition, or to specify in what way the
labor was deficient within 5 days after receiving notice from the
payee that the instrument has not been paid by the drawee.
4. The notice must be sent to the drawer by certified mail,
return receipt requested, at the address shown on the instrument.
The notice must include a statement of the penalties set forth in this
section. Return of the notice because of nondelivery to the drawer
raises a rebuttable presumption of the intent to defraud.
5. A notice in boldface type clearly legible and in substantially
the following form must be posted in a conspicuous place in every
principal and branch office of every bank and in every place of
business in which retail selling is conducted or labor is performed
for the public and must be furnished in written form by a landlord to
a tenant:

The stopping of payment on a check or other instrument
given in payment for property which can be returned in the
same condition in which it was originally received, rent or
labor which was completed in a workmanlike manner, and the
failure to return or offer to return the property in that
condition or to specify in what way the labor was deficient
within 5 days after receiving notice of nonpayment is
punishable:
1. If the value of the property, rent or labor fraudulently
obtained was less than [$1,200,] $650, as a misdemeanor by
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 6 months,
or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both fine and
imprisonment.
2. If the value of the property, rent or labor fraudulently
obtained was [$1,200] $650 or more but less than [$5,000,]
$3,000, as a category D felony by imprisonment in the state
prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
-
*SB264*

– 15 –
maximum term of not more than 4 years, or by a fine of not
more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
3. If the value of the property, rent or labor fraudulently
obtained was [$5,000] $3,000 or more but less than
[$25,000,] $10,000, as a category C felony by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year
and a maximum term of not more than 5 years, or by a fine of
not more than $10,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
4. If the value of the property, rent or labor fraudulently
obtained was [$25,000] $10,000 or more but less than
$100,000, as a category B felony by imprisonment in the state
prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 10 years, and by a fine of
not more than $10,000.
5. If the value of the property, rent or labor fraudulently
obtained was $100,000 or more, as a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not
less than [1 year] 2 years and a maximum term of not more
than 20 years, and by a fine of not more than $15,000.
Sec. 15. NRS 205.415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.415 A person who sells one or more tickets to any ball,
benefit or entertainment, or asks or receives any subscription or
promise thereof, for the benefit or pretended benefit of any person,
association or order, without being authorized thereto by the person,
association or order for whose benefit or pretended benefit it is
done, shall be punished:
1. Where the amount received from such sales, subscriptions or
promises totals [$1,200] $650 or more, for a category D felony as
provided in NRS 193.130. In addition to any other penalty, the court
shall order the person to pay restitution.
2. Otherwise, for a misdemeanor.
Sec. 16. NRS 205.445 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.445 1. It is unlawful for a person:
(a) To obtain food, foodstuffs, lodging, merchandise or other
accommodations at any hotel, inn, trailer park, motor court,
boardinghouse, rooming house, lodging house, furnished apartment
house, furnished bungalow court, furnished automobile camp, eating
house, restaurant, grocery store, market or dairy, without paying
therefor, with the intent to defraud the proprietor or manager
thereof;
(b) To obtain credit at a hotel, inn, trailer park, motor court,
boardinghouse, rooming house, lodging house, furnished apartment
house, furnished bungalow court, furnished automobile camp, eating
house, restaurant, grocery store, market or dairy by the use of any
false pretense; or
-
*SB264*

– 16 –
(c) After obtaining credit, food, lodging, merchandise or other
accommodations at a hotel, inn, trailer park, motor court,
boardinghouse, rooming house, lodging house, furnished apartment
house, furnished bungalow court, furnished automobile camp, eating
house, restaurant, grocery store, market or dairy, to abscond or
surreptitiously, or by force, menace or threats, to remove any part of
his or her baggage therefrom, without paying for the food or
accommodations.
2. A person who violates any of the provisions of subsection 1
shall be punished:
(a) Where the total value of the credit, food, foodstuffs, lodging,
merchandise or other accommodations received from any one
establishment is [$1,200] $650 or more, for a category D felony as
provided in NRS 193.130. In addition to any other penalty, the court
shall order the person to pay restitution.
(b) Otherwise, for a misdemeanor.
3. Proof that lodging, food, foodstuffs, merchandise or other
accommodations were obtained by false pretense, or by false or
fictitious show or pretense of any baggage or other property, or that
the person refused or willfully neglected to pay for the food,
foodstuffs, lodging, merchandise or other accommodations, or that
the person gave in payment for the food, foodstuffs, lodging,
merchandise or other accommodations negotiable paper on which
payment was refused, or that the person absconded without paying
or offering to pay for the food, foodstuffs, lodging, merchandise or
other accommodations, or that the person surreptitiously removed or
attempted to remove his or her baggage, is prima facie evidence of
the fraudulent intent mentioned in this section.
4. This section does not apply where there has been an
agreement in writing for delay in payment for a period to exceed 10
days.
Sec. 17. NRS 205.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.520 A bailee, or any officer, agent or servant of a bailee,
who issues or aids in issuing a document of title, knowing that the
goods covered by the document of title have not been received by
him or her, or are not under his or her control at the time the
document is issued, shall be punished:
1. Where the value of the goods purported to be covered by the
document of title is [$1,200] $650 or more, for a category D felony
as provided in NRS 193.130. In addition to any other penalty, the
court shall order the person to pay restitution.
2. Where the value is less than [$1,200,] $650, for a
misdemeanor.
-
*SB264*

– 17 –
Sec. 18. NRS 205.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.540 Except as otherwise provided in chapters 104 to 104C,
inclusive, of NRS, a bailee, or any officer, agent or servant of a
bailee, who issues or aids in issuing a duplicate or additional
negotiable document of title, knowing that a former negotiable
document for the same goods or any part of them is outstanding and
uncancelled, shall be punished:
1. Where the value of the goods purported to be covered by the
document of title is [$1,200] $650 or more, for a category D felony
as provided in NRS 193.130. In addition to any other penalty, the
court shall order the person to pay restitution.
2. Where the value is less than [$1,200,] $650, for a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 19. NRS 205.570 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.570 A person who, with the intent to defraud, obtains a
negotiable document of title for goods to which the person does not
have title, or which are subject to a security interest, and negotiates
the document for value, without disclosing the want of title or the
existence of the security interest, shall be punished:
1. Where the value of the goods purported to be covered by the
document of title is [$1,200] $650 or more, for a category D felony
as provided in NRS 193.130. In addition to any other penalty, the
court shall order the person to pay restitution.
2. Where the value is less than [$1,200,] $650, for a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 20. NRS 205.580 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.580 A person who, with the intent to defraud, secures the
issue by a bailee of a negotiable document of title, knowing at the
time of issue that any or all of the goods are not in possession of
the bailee, by inducing the bailee to believe that the goods are in the
bailee’s possession, shall be punished:
1. Where the value of the goods purported to be covered by the
document of title is [$1,200] $650 or more, for a category D felony
as provided in NRS 193.130. In addition to any other penalty, the
court shall order the person to pay restitution.
2. Where the value is less than [$1,200,] $650, for a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 21. NRS 205.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.590 A person who, with the intent to defraud, negotiates or
transfers for value a document of title, which by the terms thereof
represents that goods are in possession of the bailee who issued the
document, knowing that the bailee is not in possession of the goods
or any part thereof, without disclosing this fact, shall be punished:
1. Where the value of the goods purported to be covered by the
document of title is [$1,200] $650 or more, for a category D felony
-
*SB264*

– 18 –
as provided in NRS 193.130. In addition to any other penalty, the
court shall order the person to pay restitution.
2. Where the value is less than [$1,200,] $650, for a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 22. NRS 205.950 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.950 1. It is unlawful for a person to receive an advance
fee, salary, deposit or money to obtain a loan for another unless the
person places the advance fee, salary, deposit or money in escrow
pending completion of the loan or a commitment for the loan.
2. Advance payments to cover reasonably estimated costs paid
to third persons are excluded from the provisions of subsection 1 if
the person making them first signs a written agreement which
specifies the estimated costs by item and the estimated aggregate
cost, and which recites that money advanced for costs will not be
refunded. If an itemized service is not performed and the estimated
cost thereof is not refunded, the recipient of the advance payment is
subject to the penalties provided in subsection 3.
3. A person who violates the provisions of this section:
(a) Is guilty of a misdemeanor if the amount is less than
[$1,200;] $650; or
(b) Is guilty of a category D felony if the amount is [$1,200]
$650 or more and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
Sec. 23. Chapter 207 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person who:
(a) Has been convicted in this State of any theft offense
punishable as a misdemeanor committed on or after October 1,
2025; and
(b) Has previously been two times convicted, whether in this
State or elsewhere, of any theft offense punishable as a
misdemeanor committed before, on or after October 1, 2025,
 is a habitual theft offender and shall be punished for a category
B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term
of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years.
2. The prosecuting attorney shall include a count under this
section in any information or shall file a notice of habitual theft
offender if an indictment is found, if the prior convictions and the
alleged theft offenses committed by the accused are
misdemeanors.
3. As used in this section, “theft offense” means:
(a) Theft in violation of any provision of NRS 205.0821 to
205.0835, inclusive, if the value of the property or services
involved in the theft is less than $650;
(b) Petit larceny pursuant to NRS 205.240;
-
*SB264*

– 19 –
(c) An offense involving stolen property pursuant to NRS
205.275, if the value of the property is less than $650;
(d) Any other offense involving theft or stolen property which
is punishable as a misdemeanor; or
(e) A violation of the law of any other jurisdiction that
prohibits the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraphs
(a) to (d), inclusive.
Sec. 24. NRS 207.012 is hereby amended to read as follows:
207.012 1. A person who:
(a) Has been convicted in this State of a felony listed in
subsection 2; and
(b) Before the commission of that felony, was twice convicted
of any crime which under the laws of the situs of the crime or of this
State would be a felony listed in subsection 2, whether the prior
convictions occurred in this State or elsewhere,
 is a habitual felon and shall be punished for a category A felony
by imprisonment in the state prison:
(1) For life without the possibility of parole;
(2) For life with the possibility of parole, with eligibility for
parole beginning when a minimum of 10 years has been served; or
(3) For a definite term of 25 years, with eligibility for parole
beginning when a minimum of 10 years has been served.
2. The district attorney shall include a count under this section
in any information or shall file a notice of habitual felon if an
indictment is found, if each prior conviction and the alleged offense
committed by the accused constitutes a violation of subparagraph
(1) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 193.153, NRS 199.160,
199.500, 200.030, 200.310, 200.340, 200.366, 200.380, 200.390,
subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 200.400, NRS 200.410, subsection 3 of
NRS 200.450, subsection 5 of NRS 200.460, NRS 200.463,
200.4631, 200.464, 200.465, 200.467, 200.468, subsection 1,
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 or subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b)
of subsection 2 of NRS 200.508, NRS 200.710, 200.720, 201.230,
201.450, 202.170, subsection 2 of NRS 202.780, paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 of NRS 202.820, paragraph (b) of subsection 1 or
subsection 2 of NRS 202.830, NRS 205.010, subsection [5] 6 of
NRS 205.060, subsection 4 of NRS 205.067, NRS 205.075,
207.400, paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 212.090, NRS
453.3325, 453.333, 484C.130, 484C.430 or 484E.010.
3. The trial judge may not dismiss a count under this section
that is included in an indictment or information.
Sec. 25. NRS 207.016 is hereby amended to read as follows:
207.016 1. A conviction pursuant to NRS 207.010, 207.012
or 207.014 or section 23 of this act operates only to increase, not to
-
*SB264*

– 20 –
reduce, the sentence otherwise provided by law for the principal
crime.
2. If a count pursuant to NRS 207.010, 207.012 or 207.014 or
section 23 of this act is included in an information charging the
primary offense, each previous conviction must be alleged in the
accusatory pleading, but no such conviction may be alluded to on
trial of the primary offense, nor may any allegation of the conviction
be read in the presence of a jury trying the offense or a grand jury
considering an indictment for the offense. A count pursuant to NRS
207.010, 207.012 or 207.014 or section 23 of this act may be filed
separately from the indictment or information charging the primary
offense, but if it is so filed, the count pursuant to NRS 207.010,
207.012 or 207.014 or section 23 of this act must be filed not less
than 2 days before the start of the trial on the primary offense,
unless an agreement of the parties provides otherwise or the court
for good cause shown makes an order extending the time. For good
cause shown, the prosecution may supplement or amend a count
pursuant to NRS 207.010, 207.012 or 207.014 or section 23 of this
act at any time before the sentence is imposed, but if such a
supplement or amendment is filed, the sentence must not be
imposed, or the hearing required by subsection 3 held, until 15 days
after the separate filing.
3. If a defendant charged pursuant to NRS 207.010, 207.012 or
207.014 or section 23 of this act pleads guilty or guilty but mentally
ill to, or is found guilty or guilty but mentally ill of, the primary
offense but denies any previous conviction charged, the court shall
determine the issue of the previous conviction after hearing all
relevant evidence presented on the issue by the prosecution and the
defendant. At such a hearing, the defendant may not challenge the
validity of a previous conviction. The court shall impose sentence:
(a) Pursuant to NRS 207.010 upon finding that the defendant
has suffered previous convictions sufficient to support an
adjudication of habitual criminality;
(b) Pursuant to NRS 207.012 upon finding that the defendant
has suffered previous convictions sufficient to support an
adjudication of habitual felon; [or]
(c) Pursuant to NRS 207.014 upon finding that the defendant
has suffered previous convictions sufficient to support an
adjudication of habitually fraudulent felon [.] ; or
(d) Pursuant to section 23 of this act upon finding that the
defendant has suffered previous convictions sufficient to support
an adjudication of habitual theft offender.
4. Nothing in the provisions of this section, NRS 207.010,
207.012 or 207.014 or section 23 of this act limits the prosecution
-
*SB264*

– 21 –
in introducing evidence of prior convictions for purposes of
impeachment.
5. For the purposes of NRS 207.010, 207.012 and 207.014, a
certified copy of a felony conviction is prima facie evidence of
conviction of a prior felony.
6. For the purposes of section 23 of this act, a certified copy
of a misdemeanor conviction is prima facie evidence of conviction
of a prior misdemeanor.
[6.] 7. Nothing in the provisions of this section, NRS 207.010,
207.012 or 207.014 or section 23 of this act prohibits a court from
imposing an adjudication of habitual criminality, adjudication of
habitual felon , [or] adjudication of habitually fraudulent felon or
adjudication of habitual theft offender based upon an agreement of
the parties.
Sec. 26. NRS 173.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
173.095 1. The court may permit an indictment or
information to be amended at any time before verdict or finding if
no additional or different offense is charged and if substantial rights
of the defendant are not prejudiced.
2. If an indictment is found charging a primary offense upon
which a charge of habitual criminality may be based, the
prosecuting attorney may file a notice of habitual criminality with
the court. If an indictment is found charging a primary offense upon
which a charge of:
(a) Habitually fraudulent felon may be based, the prosecuting
attorney shall file a notice of habitually fraudulent felon with the
court.
(b) Habitual felon may be based, the prosecuting attorney shall
file a notice of habitual felon with the court.
(c) Habitual theft offender may be based, the prosecuting
attorney shall file a notice of habitual theft offender with the
court.
3. The court shall permit an information to be amended
pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 173.035.
Sec. 27. NRS 176A.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.100 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 176A.110 and 176A.120, if a person is found guilty in a
district court upon verdict or plea of:
(a) Murder of the first or second degree, kidnapping in the first
degree, sexual assault, attempted sexual assault of a child who is
less than 16 years of age, lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS
201.230, an offense for which the suspension of sentence or the
granting of probation is expressly forbidden, or if the person is
found to be a habitual criminal pursuant to NRS 207.010, a
habitually fraudulent felon pursuant to NRS 207.014 , [or] a habitual
-
*SB264*

– 22 –
felon pursuant to NRS 207.012 [,] or a habitual theft offender
pursuant to section 23 of this act, the court shall not suspend the
execution of the sentence imposed or grant probation to the person.
(b) A category E felony, except as otherwise provided in this
paragraph, the court shall suspend the execution of the sentence
imposed and grant probation to the person. The court may, as it
deems advisable, decide not to suspend the execution of the
sentence imposed and grant probation to the person if, at the time of
sentencing, it is established that the person had previously been two
times convicted, whether in this State or elsewhere, of a crime that
under the laws of the situs of the crime or of this State would
amount to a felony. If the person denies the existence of a previous
conviction, the court shall determine the issue of the previous
conviction after hearing all relevant evidence presented on the issue
by the prosecution and the person. At such a hearing, the person
may not challenge the validity of a previous conviction. For the
purposes of this paragraph, a certified copy of a felony conviction is
prima facie evidence of conviction of a prior felony.
(c) Another felony, a gross misdemeanor or a misdemeanor, the
court may suspend the execution of the sentence imposed and grant
probation as the court deems advisable.
2. In determining whether to grant probation to a person, the
court shall not consider whether the person has the financial ability
to participate in a program of probation secured by a surety bond
established pursuant to NRS 176A.300 to 176A.370, inclusive.
3. If the court determines that a person is otherwise eligible for
probation but requires more supervision than would normally be
provided to a person granted probation, the court may, in lieu of
sentencing the person to a term of imprisonment, grant probation
pursuant to the Program of Enhanced Supervision established
pursuant to NRS 176A.440.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a person
is convicted of a felony and the Division is required to make a
presentence investigation and report to the court pursuant to NRS
176.135, the court shall not grant probation to the person until the
court receives the report of the presentence investigation from the
Chief Parole and Probation Officer. The Chief Parole and Probation
Officer shall submit the report of the presentence investigation to
the court not later than 45 days after receiving a request for a
presentence investigation from the county clerk. If the report of the
presentence investigation is not submitted by the Chief Parole and
Probation Officer within 45 days, the court may grant probation
without the report.
5. If the court determines that a person is otherwise eligible for
probation, the court shall, when determining the conditions of that
-
*SB264*

– 23 –
probation, consider the imposition of such conditions as would
facilitate timely payments by the person of an obligation, if any, for
the support of a child and the payment of any such obligation which
is in arrears.
Sec. 28. NRS 475.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
475.105 A person who steals a device intended for use in
preventing, controlling, extinguishing or giving warning of a fire:
1. If the device has a value of less than [$1,200,] $650, is guilty
of a misdemeanor.
2. If the device has a value of [$1,200] $650 or more, is guilty
of a category D felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 29. NRS 501.3765 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.3765 1. Any person who intentionally steals, takes and
carries away one or more traps, snares or similar devices owned by
another person with an aggregate value of less than [$1,200] $650 is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
2. Any person who buys, receives, possesses or withholds one
or more traps, snares or similar devices owned by another person
with an aggregate value of less than [$1,200:] $650:
(a) Knowing that the traps, snares or similar devices are stolen
property; or
(b) Under such circumstances as should have caused a
reasonable person to know that the traps, snares or similar devices
are stolen property,
 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 30. NRS 598.0999 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598.0999 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 598.0974,
a person who violates a court order or injunction issued pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive, upon a
complaint brought by the Commissioner, the Director, the district
attorney of any county of this State or the Attorney General shall
forfeit and pay to the State General Fund a civil penalty of not more
than $10,000 for each violation. For the purpose of this section, the
court issuing the order or injunction retains jurisdiction over the
action or proceeding. Such civil penalties are in addition to any
other penalty or remedy available for the enforcement of the
provisions of NRS 598.0903 to 598.0999, inclusive.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 598.0974, in any
action brought pursuant to the provisions of NRS 598.0903 to
598.0999, inclusive, if the court finds that a person has willfully
engaged in a deceptive trade practice, the Commissioner, the
Director, the district attorney of any county in this State or the
Attorney General bringing the action may recover a civil penalty not
to exceed $15,000 for each violation. The court in any such action
-
*SB264*

– 24 –
may, in addition to any other relief or reimbursement, award
reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
3. A natural person, firm, or any officer or managing agent of
any corporation or association who knowingly and willfully engages
in a deceptive trade practice:
(a) For an offense involving a loss of property or services valued
at [$1,200] $650 or more but less than [$5,000,] $3,000, is guilty of
a category D felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(b) For an offense involving a loss of property or services
valued at [$5,000] $3,000 or more but less than [$25,000,] $10,000,
is guilty of a category C felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) For an offense involving a loss of property or services valued
at [$25,000] $10,000 or more but less than $100,000, is guilty of a
category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 10 years, and by a fine of not more
than $10,000.
(d) For an offense involving a loss of property or services
valued at $100,000 or more, is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than [1 year] 2 years and a maximum
term of not more than 20 years, and by a fine of not more than
$15,000.
(e) For any offense other than an offense described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
 The court may require the natural person, firm, or officer or
managing agent of the corporation or association to pay to the
aggrieved party damages on all profits derived from the knowing
and willful engagement in a deceptive trade practice and treble
damages on all damages suffered by reason of the deceptive trade
practice.
4. If a person violates any provision of NRS 598.0903 to
598.0999, inclusive, 598.100 to 598.2801, inclusive, 598.405 to
598.525, inclusive, 598.741 to 598.787, inclusive, 598.840
to 598.966, inclusive, or 598.9701 to 598.9718, inclusive, fails to
comply with a judgment or order of any court in this State
concerning a violation of such a provision, or fails to comply with
an assurance of discontinuance or other agreement concerning an
alleged violation of such a provision, the Commissioner or the
district attorney of any county may bring an action in the name of
the State of Nevada seeking:
(a) The suspension of the person’s privilege to conduct business
within this State; or
-
*SB264*

– 25 –
(b) If the defendant is a corporation, dissolution of the
corporation.
 The court may grant or deny the relief sought or may order other
appropriate relief.
5. If a person violates any provision of NRS 228.500 to
228.640, inclusive, fails to comply with a judgment or order of any
court in this State concerning a violation of such a provision, or fails
to comply with an assurance of discontinuance or other agreement
concerning an alleged violation of such a provision, the Attorney
General may bring an action in the name of the State of Nevada
seeking:
(a) The suspension of the person’s privilege to conduct business
within this State; or
(b) If the defendant is a corporation, dissolution of the
corporation.
 The court may grant or deny the relief sought or may order other
appropriate relief.
6. In an action brought by the Commissioner or the Attorney
General pursuant to subsection 4 or 5, process may be served by an
employee of the Consumer Affairs Unit of the Department of
Business and Industry or an employee of the Attorney General.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Property” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 193.0225.
(b) “Services” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.0829.
(c) “Value” means the fair market value of the property or
services at the time the deceptive trade practice occurred. The value
of a written instrument which does not have a readily ascertainable
market value is the greater of the face amount of the instrument less
the portion satisfied or the amount of economic loss to the owner of
the instrument resulting from the deprivation of the instrument. The
trier of fact shall determine the value of all other property whose
value is not readily ascertainable, and may, in making that
determination, consider all relevant evidence, including evidence of
the value of the property to its owner.
Sec. 31. NRS 612.445 is hereby amended to read as follows:
612.445 1. A person shall not make a false statement or
representation, knowing it to be false, or knowingly fail to disclose a
material fact in order to obtain or increase any benefit or other
payment under this chapter, including, without limitation, by:
(a) Failing to properly report earnings;
(b) Filing a claim for benefits using the social security number,
name or other personal identifying information of another person; or
(c) Filing a claim for or receiving benefits and failing to
disclose, at the time he or she files the claim or receives the benefits,
any compensation for a temporary total disability or a temporary
-
*SB264*

– 26 –
partial disability or money for rehabilitative services pursuant to
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, or 617 of NRS received by the
person or for which a claim has been submitted pursuant to those
chapters.
 A person who violates the provisions of this subsection commits
unemployment insurance fraud.
2. When the Administrator finds that a person has committed
unemployment insurance fraud pursuant to subsection 1, the person
shall repay to the Administrator for deposit in the Fund a sum equal
to all of the benefits received by or paid to the person for each week
with respect to which the false statement or representation was made
or to which the person failed to disclose a material fact in addition to
any interest, penalties and costs related to that sum. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS 612.480, the
Administrator may make an initial determination finding that a
person has committed unemployment insurance fraud pursuant to
subsection 1 at any time within 4 years after the first day of the
benefit year in which the person committed the unemployment
insurance fraud.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsection 8, the person is disqualified from receiving
unemployment compensation benefits under this chapter:
(a) For a period beginning with the week in which the
Administrator issues a finding that the person has committed
unemployment insurance fraud pursuant to subsection 1 and ending
not more than 52 consecutive weeks after the week in which it is
determined that a claim was filed in violation of subsection 1; or
(b) Until the sum described in subsection 2, in addition to any
interest, penalties or costs related to that sum, is repaid to the
Administrator,
 whichever is longer. The Administrator shall fix the period of
disqualification according to the circumstances in each case.
4. It is a violation of subsection 1 for a person to file a claim,
or to cause or allow a claim to be filed on his or her behalf, if:
(a) The person is incarcerated in the state prison or any county
or city jail or detention facility or other correctional facility in this
State; and
(b) The claim does not expressly disclose his or her
incarceration.
5. A person who obtains benefits of [$1,200] $650 or more in
violation of subsection 1 shall be punished in the same manner as
theft pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 205.0835.
6. In addition to the repayment of benefits required pursuant to
subsection 2, the Administrator:
-
*SB264*

– 27 –
(a) Shall impose a penalty equal to 15 percent of the total
amount of benefits received by the person in violation of subsection
1. Money recovered by the Administrator pursuant to this paragraph
must be deposited in the Unemployment Trust Fund in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 612.590.
(b) May impose a penalty equal to not more than:
(1) If the amount of such benefits is greater than $25 but not
greater than $1,000, 5 percent;
(2) If the amount of such benefits is greater than $1,000 but
not greater than $2,500, 10 percent; or
(3) If the amount of such benefits is greater than $2,500, 35
percent,
 of the total amount of benefits received by the person in violation
of subsection 1 or any other provision of this chapter. Money
recovered by the Administrator pursuant to this paragraph must be
deposited in the Employment Security Fund in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 612.615.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a person may
not pay benefits as required pursuant to subsection 2 by using
benefits which would otherwise be due and payable to the person if
he or she was not disqualified.
8. The Administrator may waive the period of disqualification
prescribed in subsection 3 for good cause shown or if the person
adheres to a repayment schedule authorized by the Administrator
that is designed to fully repay benefits received from an improper
claim, in addition to any related interest, penalties and costs, within
18 months. If the Administrator waives the period of
disqualification pursuant to this subsection, the person may repay
benefits as required pursuant to subsection 2 by using any benefits
which are due and payable to the person, except that benefits which
are due and payable to the person may not be used to repay any
related interest, penalties and costs.
9. The Administrator may recover any money required to be
paid pursuant to this section in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 612.365 and may collect interest on any such money in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 612.620.
Sec. 32. NRS 646.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
646.060 A pawnbroker, and a clerk, agent or employee of a
pawnbroker, is guilty of a misdemeanor if he or she:
1. Fails to make an entry of any material matter in a book or
record kept as provided for in NRS 646.020.
2. Makes a false entry in the book or record.
3. Obliterates, destroys or removes from his or her place of
business the book or record.
-
*SB264*

– 28 –
4. Refuses to allow the prosecuting attorney or a peace officer
to inspect the book or record or any goods in his or her possession,
during the ordinary hours of business.
5. Reports a material matter falsely to the sheriff or to the chief
of police.
6. Fails to report immediately to the sheriff or to the chief of
police the possession of property which he or she may have good
cause to believe has been lost or stolen, together with the name of
the owner, if known, and the date when and the name of the person
from whom he or she received the property.
7. Removes property received or allows it to be removed from
his or her place of business in violation of NRS 646.040.
8. Receives property from a person under the age of 18 years,
common drunkard, habitual user of controlled substances, habitual
criminal, habitual felon, habitually fraudulent felon, habitual theft
offender, person in an intoxicated condition, known thief or receiver
of stolen property, or known associate of a thief or receiver of stolen
property, whether the person is acting in his or her own behalf or as
the agent of another.
9. Violates any of the provisions of NRS 646.050.
Sec. 33. NRS 647.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
647.140 A secondhand dealer and a clerk, agent or employee
of a secondhand dealer is guilty of a misdemeanor if he or she:
1. Fails to make an entry of any material matter in a book or
record kept as provided for in NRS 647.110.
2. Makes a false entry in the book or record.
3. Obliterates, destroys or removes from his or her place of
business the book or record.
4. Refuses to allow the prosecuting attorney or a peace officer
to inspect the book or record or any goods in his or her possession,
during the ordinary hours of business.
5. Reports a material matter falsely to the sheriff or to the chief
of police.
6. Fails to report immediately to the sheriff or to the chief of
police the possession of property which he or she may have good
cause to believe has been lost or stolen, together with the name of
the owner, if known, and the date when and the name of the person
from whom he or she received the property.
7. Removes specifically marked or otherwise individually
identifiable property received or allows it to be removed from his or
her place of business or place of storage in violation of the
provisions of NRS 647.130.
8. Receives property from a person under the age of 18 years,
common drunkard, habitual user of controlled substances, habitual
criminal, habitual felon, habitually fraudulent felon, habitual theft
-
*SB264*

– 29 –
offender, person in an intoxicated condition, known thief or receiver
of stolen property, or known associate of a thief or receiver of stolen
property, whether the person is acting in his or her own behalf or as
the agent of another.
H
-
*SB264*